Hawaii statutes.
§201H-72 Issuance of bonds for the
development of infrastructure. Without limiting section 201H-71, the
corporation, pursuant to and in accordance with this subpart or section
46-80.1(a), is authorized to issue bonds for the purpose of financing the development
of infrastructure for land owned by the corporation or for land owned by an
eligible developer as defined in section 201H-32 whose housing project approval
by a state or county agency requires the construction of affordable housing. [L
2006, c 180, pt of §4; am L 2014, c 194, §1; am L 2015, c 156, §2]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next